Illinois, session 104th, SB3382.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Highway Code is amended by adding 5Section 4-211.1 as follows: 6    (605 ILCS 5/4-211.1 new)7    Sec. 4-211.1. Expedited review of permits. 8    (a) It is the intent of this Section to promote an 9expedited permit review process for any permit for an entrance 10or exit to a subdivision for affordable housing developments 11as required by Section 4-209.12    (b) Any applicant for a permit under Section 4-211 may 13request in writing from the Department an expedited review of 14the application for a permit. Within a reasonable time, the 15Department shall respond in writing indicating whether the 16Department will perform an expedited review.17    (c) In addition to any other fees required by this Act or 18rules adopted by the Department, an applicant requesting 19expedited review under this Section shall pay to the 20Department an expedited permit fee. The amount of the 21expedited permit fee shall be $10,000. Prior to any Department 22review, the applicant shall make full payment of the expedited 23permit fee to the Department. All amounts paid to the   SB3382- 2 -LRB104 18448 LNS 31890 b1Department pursuant to this Section shall be deposited into 2the Road Fund. The applicant shall also pay all standard 3permit fees in accordance with the applicable fee provisions 4of this Act or rules adopted by the Department.5    (d) The Department's expedited review under this Section 6shall include the usual and customary review by the Department 7as necessary for processing any similar application.8    (e) As used in this Section, "expedited review" means the 9Department taking action on a permit application within a 10period of time mutually agreed upon by the Department and the 11applicant; however, the agreed-upon period of time shall be 12tolled during any time the Department is waiting for the 13applicant or another party to provide information necessary 14for the Department to complete its expedited review.15    (f) If the Department fails to complete an expedited 16review within the period of time agreed upon by the Department 17and the applicant, taking into account the tolling provided 18under subsection (e), the applicant shall be entitled to a 19refund of the expedited permit fee paid under this Section, on 20a prorated basis, as mutually agreed upon by the Department 21and the applicant.22    (g) This Section shall not apply to applications related 23to emergency events necessitating immediate action by the 24Department on permit applications.25    (h) The Department may adopt rules for the implementation 26of this Section.